Tennessee, session 114, HB0319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-501(11), is amended by
deleting the following:
"Residential property" includes all real property that is used, or held for use, for
dwelling purposes and that contains not more than one (1) rental unit.
and substituting instead:
"Residential property" includes all real property that is used, or held for use, for
dwelling purposes, that can be sold and purchased as a single unit fee simple title,
whether it is vacant, owner-occupied, rented, or detached or attached, and that contains
not more than one (1) rental unit.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0319
001197
- 1 -